Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-6544
Grow the Good Life Act, how cited.

Sections 77-6544 to 77-6555 shall be known and may be cited as the Grow the Good Life Act.

Laws 2026, LB1165, § 1.
April 17, 2026